Washington statutes.
RCW 17.24.210

Indemnity contracts for damages resulting from prevention, control, or eradication measures—Authorized—Conditions.

The director of agriculture may, on the behalf of the state of Washington, enter into indemnity contracts wherein the state of Washington agrees to repay any person, firm, corporation, or other entity acting under the direction or control of the proper authority to provide plant pest or plant disease prevention, control, or eradication measures as provided in this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, for losses and damages incurred as a result of such prevention, control, or eradication measures if all of the following conditions occur:

(1) At the time of the incident the worker is performing services as an emergency measures worker and is acting within the course of his or her duties as an emergency measures worker;

(2) At the time of the injury, loss, or damage, the organization providing emergency measures by which the worker is employed is an approved organization for providing emergency measures;

(3) The injury, loss, or damage is proximately caused by his or her service either with or without negligence as an emergency measures worker;

(4) The injury, loss, or damage is not caused by the intoxication of the worker; and

(5) The injury, loss, or damage is not due to willful misconduct or gross negligence on the part of a worker.

Where an act or omission by an emergency services provider in the course of providing emergency services injures a person or property, the provider and the state may be jointly and severally liable for the injury, if state liability is proved under existing or hereafter enacted law.

[ 2011 c 336 s 461; 2011 c 103 s 43; 1982 c 153 s 3.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2011 c 103 s 43 and by 2011 c 336 s 461, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Severability—1982 c 153: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1982 c 153 s 5.]

Effective date—1982 c 153: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect April 1, 1982." [ 1982 c 153 s 7.]